Massachusetts, session 194th, S1217.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. A person, who is 18 years of age or older and of sound mind, by entering
into a pre-need funeral service contract as defined in 239 CMR 4.01 or by providing instructions
in a written and sworn affidavit, may direct the location, manner and conditions of disposition of
the person's remains, and the arrangements for funeral goods and services to be provided upon
the person's death. The disposition directions and funeral prearrangements that are contained in a
pre-need funeral services contract shall not be subject to cancellation or substantial revision
unless the cancellation or substantial revision has been ordered by a person who the decedent has
appointed in the pre-need funeral services contract as the person authorized to cancel or revise
the terms of the pre-need funeral services contract, or unless any resources set aside to fund the
pre-need funeral services contract are insufficient under the terms of the pre-need funeral
services contract to carry out the disposition directions and funeral prearrangements contained
therein.
of 8

SECTION 2. Except as set forth in Section (4), the right to control the disposition of the
remains of a deceased person, the location, manner and conditions of disposition, and
arrangements for funeral goods and services to be provided vests in the following in the order
named, provided such person is 18 years or older and is of sound mind:
a) (1) A person designated by the decedent as the person with the right to control the
disposition in an affidavit executed in accordance with Section 3; or (2) a person designated in
the federal Record of Emergency Date Form DO 93, or its successor form, to have the right of
disposition by a member of the military who dies while under active duty orders as described in
10 U.S.C. 1481.
b) The surviving spouse.
c) The sole surviving child of the decedent, or if there is more than one child of the
decedent, the majority of the surviving children. However, less than one-half of the surviving
children shall be vested with the rights of this section if they have used reasonable efforts to
notify all other surviving children of their instructions and are not aware of any opposition to
those instructions on the part of more than one-half of all surviving children.
d) The surviving parent or parents of the decedent. If one of the surviving parents is
absent, the remaining parent shall be vested with the rights and duties of this section after
reasonable efforts have been unsuccessful in locating the absent surviving parent.
e) The surviving brother or sister of the decedent, or if there is more than one sibling of
the decedent, the majority of the surviving siblings. However, less than the majority of surviving
siblings shall be vested with the rights and duties of this section if they have used reasonable
of 8

efforts to notify all other surviving siblings of their instructions and are not aware of any
opposition to those instructions on the part of more than one-half of all surviving siblings.
f) The surviving grandparent of the decedent, or if there is more than one surviving
grandparent, the majority of the grandparents. However, less than the majority of the surviving
grandparents shall be vested with the rights and duties of this section if they have used
reasonable efforts to notify all other surviving grandparents of their instructions and are not
aware of any opposition to those instructions on the part of more than one-half of all surviving
grandparents.
g) The guardian of the person of the decedent at the time of the decedent's death, if one
had been appointed.
h) The personal representative of the estate of the decedent.
i) The person in the classes of the next degree of kinship, in descending order, under the
laws of descent and distribution to inherit the estate of the decedent. If there is more than one
person of the same degree, any person of that degree may exercise the right of disposition.
j) If the disposition of the remains of the decedent is the responsibility of the state or a
political subdivision of the state, the public officer, administrator or employee responsible for
arranging the final disposition of decedent's remains.
k) In the absence of any person under subsections (a) through (j) of this section, any other
person willing to assume the responsibilities to act and arrange the final disposition of the
decedent's remains, including the funeral director with custody of the body, after attesting in
of 8

writing that a good faith effort has been made to no avail to contact the individuals under
subsections (a) through (j) of this section.
SECTION 3. A person who is 18 years of age or older and of sound mind wishing to
authorize another person to control the disposition of his or her remains may execute an affidavit
before a notary public in substantially the following form:
"State of :----- }
County of ----- }
I, ---------------------------------do hereby designate ---------------------------with the right to
control the disposition of my remains upon my death. I ______have/ ______have not
attached specific directions concerning the disposition of my remains which the designee
shall substantially comply with, provided such directions are lawful and there are sufficient
resources in my estate to carry out the directions.
Subscribed and sworn to before me this ______.day of the month of ______.of the
year ______.
___________________ (signature of notary public)"
SECTION 4. A person entitled under law to the right of disposition shall forfeit that right,
and the right is passed on to the next qualifying person as listed in Section (2), in the following
circumstances:
a) Any person charged with first or second degree murder or voluntary manslaughter in
connection with the decedent's death, and whose charges are known to the funeral director;
of 8

provided, however that if the charges against such person are dismissed, or if such person is
acquitted of the charges, the right of disposition is returned to the person.
b) Any person who does not exercise his or her right of disposition within two days of
notification of the death of decedent or within three days of decedent's death, whichever is
earlier.
c) If the person and the decedent are spouses and a petition to dissolve the marriage was
pending at the time of decedent's death.
d) Where the probate court pursuant to Section (5) below determines that the person
entitled to the right of disposition and the decedent were estranged at the time of death. For
purposes of this subdivision, "estranged" means a physical and emotional separation from the
decedent at the time of death which has existed for a period of time that clearly demonstrates an
absence of due affection, trust and regard for the decedent.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the probate court for the county where the
decedent resided may award the right of disposition to the person determined by the court to be
the most fit and appropriate to carry out the right of disposition, and may make decisions
regarding the decedent's remains if those sharing the right of disposition cannot agree. The
following provisions shall apply to the court's determination under this section:
a) If the persons holding the right of disposition are two or more persons with the same
relationship to the decedent, and they cannot, by majority vote, make a decision regarding the
disposition of the decedent's remains, any of such persons or a funeral home with custody of the
remains may file a petition asking the probate court to make a determination in the matter.
of 8

b) In making a determination under this Section, the probate court shall consider the
following:
(1) The reasonableness and practicality of the proposed funeral arrangements and
disposition.
(2) The degree of the personal relationship between the decedent and each of the persons
100 claiming the right of disposition.
101 (3) The desires of the person or persons who are ready, able and willing to pay the cost of
102 the funeral arrangements and disposition.
103 (4) The convenience and needs of other families and friends wishing to pay respects.
104 (5) The desires of the decedent.
105 (6) The degree to which the funeral arrangements would allow maximum participation by
106 all wishing to pay respect.
107 c) In the event of a dispute regarding the right of disposition, a funeral home is not liable
108 for refusing to accept the remains or to inter or otherwise dispose of the remains of the decedent
109 or complete the arrangements for the final disposition of the remains until the funeral home
110 receives a court order or other written agreement signed by the parties in the disagreement that
111 decides the final disposition of the remains. If the funeral home retains the remains for final
112 disposition while the parties are in disagreement, the funeral home may embalm or refrigerate
113 and shelter the body, or both, in order to preserve it while awaiting the final decision of the
114 probate court and may add the cost of embalming and refrigeration and sheltering to the final
115 disposition costs. If a funeral home brings an action under this section, the funeral home may add
of 8

116 the legal fees and court costs associated with a petition under this section to the cost of final
117 disposition. This section may not be construed to require or to impose a duty upon a funeral
118 home to bring an action under this section. A funeral home and its employees may not be held
119 criminally or civilly liable for choosing not to bring an action under this section.
120 d) Except to the degree it may be considered by the probate court under clause (b)(3) of
121 Section 4 above, the fact that a person has paid or agreed to pay for all or part of the funeral
122 arrangements and final disposition does not give that person a greater right to the right of
123 disposition than the person would otherwise have. The personal representative of the estate of the
124 decedent does not, by virtue of being the personal representative, have a greater claim to the right
125 of disposition than the person would otherwise have.
126 SECTION 6. Any person signing a funeral service agreement, cremation authorization
127 form, or any other authorization for disposition shall be deemed to warrant the truthfulness of
128 any facts set forth therein, including the identity of the decedent whose remains are to be buried,
129 cremated, or otherwise disposed of, and the party's authority to order such disposition. A funeral
130 home shall have the right to rely on such funeral service contract or authorization and shall have
131 the authority to carry out the instructions of the person or persons whom the funeral home
132 reasonably believes holds the right of disposition. The funeral home shall have no responsibility
133 to contact or to independently investigate the existence of any next-of-kin or relative of the
134 decedent. If there is more than one person in a class who are equal in priority and the funeral
135 home has no knowledge of any objection by other members of such class, the funeral home shall
136 be entitled to rely on and act according to the instructions of the first such person in the class to
137 make funeral and disposition arrangements; provided that no other person in such class provides
138 written notice of his or her objections to the funeral home.
of 8

139 SECTION 7. No funeral home or funeral director who relies in good faith upon the
140 instructions of an individual claiming the right of disposition shall be subject to criminal or civil
141 liability or subject to disciplinary action for carrying out the disposition of the remains in
142 accordance with the instructions.
of 8